Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
In-Session Procedure

48.200.
Printing of budget recommendations — Copies for General Assembly members and clerks.

Each branch of government shall have its budget recommendations printed in such number of copies thereof as to insure that each member of the General Assembly and the clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate have individual copies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 19, effective July 1, 1983.

48.210.
Assistance to General Assembly by representatives of each branch of government.

From the time of the submission of the budget recommendation of each branch of government to the General Assembly until the enactment of all branch budget bills, representatives of each branch of government shall be at the disposal of the General Assembly and its appropriations committees and shall devote as much of their time as may be required to the work of those committees, under the direction of their respective chairmen. The Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Office of State Budget Director shall provide such additional assistance to each branch of government as may be required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 20, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 12, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 78, § 9, effective June 25, 2009.

48.300.
Adoption of branch budget bills — Separate branch budget bill required for Transportation Cabinet — Enactment of biennial highway construction plan.

The financial plan for each fiscal year as presented in the branch budget recommendation shall be adopted, with any modifications made by the General Assembly, by the passage of a branch budget bill for each branch of government, and any revenue and other acts as necessary.

With regard to the Transportation Cabinet, the General Assembly shall:

Enact, as a separate bill, a branch budget for the Transportation Cabinet;

Enact, as a separate bill, the biennial highway construction plan, as amended by the General Assembly, including identification of projects from the last four (4) years of the six (6) year road plan that may be moved forward, and the conditions and requirements under which the identified projects may be moved forward; and

Adopt the last four (4) years of the six (6) year road plan, as amended by the General Assembly, as a joint resolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 21, effective July 1, 1983; 1984, ch. 410, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 507, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 2001, ch. 58, § 5, effective June 21, 2001; 2009, ch. 78, § 10, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 73, § 10, effective June 8, 2011.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Section 1 at 980.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Section 1 at 1634.

See Legislative Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Section 1 at 1763.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Section 1 at 2016.

48.310.
Operation of budget bill.

No provision of a branch budget bill shall be effective beyond the second fiscal year from the date of its enactment. A budget bill enacted at a special session or in an odd-numbered-year regular session of the General Assembly shall not be effective past July 1 of the year in which the next even-numbered-year regular session takes place.

A budget bill may contain language which exempts the budget bill or any appropriation or the use thereof from the operation of a statute for the effective period of the budget bill.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 22, effective July 1, 1983; 1984, ch. 410, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 507, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 2001, ch. 58, § 6, effective June 21, 2001.

48.311.
Structure of branch budget bills — Severability of provisions.

Any branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly shall be enacted so that each section, each subsection, and each appropriation sum by specified fund or funds accounts shall be a separate and specific appropriation and law. If any section, any subsection, or any provision is found by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final, unappealable order to be invalid or unconstitutional, the decision of the courts shall not affect or impair any of the remaining sections, subsections, or provisions contained in that branch budget bill.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 387, § 10, effective July 15, 1994.

48.312.
Duplicate appropriations.

Any appropriation in any branch budget bill and any other enactment by the General Assembly which contains an appropriation provision for the same purpose and in the same amount shall be construed as duplicate sums, and no additional moneys shall be provided for the duplicate appropriations. Questions of interpretation of duplicate appropriations shall be determined as prescribed by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 387, § 11, effective July 15, 1994.

48.313.
Status of totals and subtotals — Priority of individual appropriations — Correction of erroneous totals and subtotals.

Totals and subtotals given within any branch budget bill and any appropriation provision in any other enactment are provided as a convenience and shall not constitute appropriations of funds. If a total or subtotal conflicts with the sum of the appropriation figures of which it consists, the amounts of the individual appropriations shall control. If a conflict of this nature arises, either as a result of an inadvertent error in initial entry of a total or subtotal or through an amendment to any of its component appropriations, the director of the Legislative Research Commission shall apprise the reviser of statutes in writing of the existence of and reason for the variation and of the correct amount of the total or subtotal. If the requested change is within the scope of this section, the reviser of statutes shall cause that corrected total or subtotal to be substituted in the Acts and journals of the General Assembly and in the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 387, § 12, effective July 15, 1994.

48.315.
Transfer of agency, special, and other funds to general fund in budget bill.

The General Assembly may provide in a budget bill for the transfer to the general fund for the purpose of the general fund all or part of the agency funds, special funds, or other funds established under the provisions of KRS

15.430

;

21.347

;

21.540

;

21.560

;

42.500

;

47.010

; 48.010(15)(g);

56.100

;

61.470

;

64.345

;

64.350

;

64.355

;

95A.220

;

136.392

;

138.510

;

161.420

;

161.430

;

164A.020

;

164A.110

;

164A.800

;

164A.810

;

216A.110

;

230.218

;

230.400

;

230.770

;

248.540

;

248.550

;

278.130

;

278.150

;

286.1-485

;

304.35-030

;

311.450

;

311.610

;

312.019

;

313.022

;

314.161

;

315.195

;

316.210

;

317.530

;

317A.080

;

319.131

;

320.360

;

321.320

;

322.290

;

322.330

;

322.420

;

323.080

;

323.190

;

323.210

;

323A.060

;

323A.190

;

323A.210

;

324.286

;

324.410

;

325.250

;

326.120

;

327.080

;

330.050

;

334.160

;

334A.120

;

335.140

;

342.122

;

342.480

, etc.

The transfer of moneys from the agency funds, special funds, or other funds to the general fund provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall be for the period of time specified in the budget bill.

Any provisions of any statute in conflict with the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section are hereby suspended or modified. Any suspension or modification shall not extend beyond the duration of the budget bill.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 410, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 109, § 39, effective March 30, 1992; 2003, ch. 169, § 4, effective March 31, 2003; 2006, ch. 207, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 78, § 11, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 85, § 18, effective July 15, 2010.

48.316.
Temporary suspension or modification of statutory provisions due to conflict with provisions of budget bill.

To the extent that the provisions of a budget bill are in conflict with any provisions of KRS Chapters 12, 42, 56, 152, 177, or 341, the provisions of those chapters are hereby suspended or modified. Such suspension or modification shall not extend beyond the duration of the budget bill.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 410, § 7, effective July 1, 1984.